Illinois, session 104th, SB3278.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Protecting Household Privacy Act is amended 5by changing Sections 5, 15, and 25 and by adding Sections 16 6and 42 as follows: 7    (5 ILCS 855/5)8    Sec. 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:9    "Electronic communication" means any origination, 10transmission, emission, transfer, or reception of signs, 11signals, data, writings, images, video, audio, or intelligence 12of any nature by telephone, including cellular telephones or a 13wire, Internet, wireless, radio, electromagnetic, 14photo-electronic or photo-optical system, cable television, 15fiber optic, satellite, microwave, Internet-based or wireless 16distribution network, system, facility or related technology.17    "Household" means any single or multiple family dwelling, 18including but not limited to a single family home, house, 19apartment, mobile home, trailer, building, condominium, 20duplex, townhouse, or other living quarters, used or intended 21to be used as a dwelling place and immediately surrounding 22area.23    "Household electronic device" means any device primarily   SB3278- 2 -LRB104 20235 BDA 34049 b1intended for use within a household that is capable of 2facilitating any electronic communication, excluding personal 3computing devices and digital gateway devices. "Household 4electronic device" includes residential security and 5surveillance systems. For purposes of this Act: "personal 6computing device" means a personal computer, cell phone, 7smartphone, or tablet; and "digital gateway device" means a 8modem, router, wireless access point, or cable set-top box 9serviced by a cable provider.10    "Household electronic data" means any information or input 11provided by a person to a household electronic device.12    "Law enforcement agency" means any agency of this State or 13a political subdivision of this State which is vested by law 14with the duty to maintain public order and to enforce criminal 15laws. 16(Source: P.A. 102-597, eff. 1-1-22.) 17    (5 ILCS 855/15)18    Sec. 15. Exceptions. This Act does not prohibit a law 19enforcement agency from obtaining household electronic data:20    (1) If a law enforcement agency first obtains a warrant 21under Section 108-4 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963.22    (2) To respond to a call for emergency services concerning 23the user or possessor of a household electronic device.24    (3) In an emergency situation:25        (A) involving a clear and present danger of imminent   SB3278- 3 -LRB104 20235 BDA 34049 b1    death or great bodily harm to a person or persons 2    resulting from a kidnapping, abduction, or the holding of 3    a hostage by force or the threat of the imminent use of 4    force;5        (B) where there was no previous notice of the 6    emergency to the investigative or law enforcement officer 7    sufficient to obtain prior judicial approval and the 8    officer reasonably believes that an order permitting the 9    obtaining of household electronic data would issue were 10    there prior judicial review;11        (C) the household electronic data is necessary and the 12    only potential data available to prevent imminent death or 13    great bodily harm to a person or persons; and 14        (D) the data must and can be accessed before a warrant 15    could be issued to prevent imminent death or great bodily 16    harm to a person or persons. 17    (4) With the lawful consent of the owner of the household 18electronic device or person in actual or constructive 19possession of the household electronic device, excluding law 20enforcement personnel. Lawful consent shall be obtained in 21accordance with Section 16 of this Act for this exception to 22apply. 23    (5) In all emergency cases arising under paragraph (2) or 24(3), an application for a search warrant approving the 25previous obtaining of household electronic data must be made 26within 72 hours of its commencement. In order to approve   SB3278- 4 -LRB104 20235 BDA 34049 b1obtaining household electronic data, the judge must make a 2determination:3        (A) that he or she would have granted a search warrant 4    had the information been before the court prior to the 5    obtaining of the household electronic data; and 6        (B) there was an emergency situation as defined in 7    subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3).8    If an application for approval under this paragraph is 9denied, the household electronic data obtained under this 10exception shall be inadmissible in accordance with Section 30. 11(Source: P.A. 102-597, eff. 1-1-22.) 12    (5 ILCS 855/16 new)13    Sec. 16. Lawful consent for law enforcement to acquire 14data. A private entity, including the manufacturer or 15distributor of a household electronic device, or third party 16which collects, processes, stores, uses, or shares data in 17partnership with the private entity, shall obtain lawful 18consent to share household electronic data pertaining only to 19a single crime investigation with a law enforcement agency 20through a written opt-in request to the owner of the household 21electronic device or person in actual or constructive 22possession of the household electronic device. The written 23request must include the following:24        (1) details about the single crime incident;25        (2) the date and timeframe for the requested footage;  SB3278- 5 -LRB104 20235 BDA 34049 b1        (3) a map showing the area the request covers;2        (4) the name and contact information of the law 3    enforcement agency investigator;4        (5) a unique investigation reference number or 5    identifier;6        (6) clear and concise language about who is 7    collecting, processing, or storing the data;8        (7) the length of term for which data is being 9    collected, processed, stored, used, and shared; and10        (8) policies about measures the private entity, third 11    party, and law enforcement agency has in place to ensure 12    the security of the data.  13    (5 ILCS 855/25)14    Sec. 25. Information disclosure by law enforcement 15agencies. 16    (a) If a law enforcement agency obtains household 17electronic data under Section 15, the agency shall not 18disclose any information obtained, except that a supervisor of 19that agency may disclose particular information to another 20government agency, employee of a government agency, or 21material witness:22        (1) if the information is relevant to a criminal 23    proceeding or investigation by a grand jury; or24        (2) with the lawful consent of the owner, or person in 25    actual or constructive possession, of the household   SB3278- 6 -LRB104 20235 BDA 34049 b1    electronic device.2    (b) When disclosing household electronic data to any other 3party, the disclosing law enforcement agency must make 4reasonable efforts to limit disclosure to the minimum 5necessary to accomplish the intended purpose of the 6disclosure. 7    (c) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to permit a law 8enforcement agency to disclose household electronic data for 9federal immigration purposes. 10(Source: P.A. 102-597, eff. 1-1-22.) 11    (5 ILCS 855/42 new)12    Sec. 42. Security of storage and access. Any person or 13entity that collects, processes, stores, uses, or shares 14household electronic data shall take reasonable measures to 15ensure the confidentiality, integrity, and security of any 16household electronic data. 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.